Utah statutes.
77-34-8.   Effect of execution of compact between states -- Renunciation of compact.

The contracting states solemnly agree:

(1)  That this compact shall become operative immediately upon its execution by any state as between it and any other state or states so executing. When executed it shall have the full force and effect of law within such state, the form of execution to be in accordance with the laws of the executing state; and

(2)  That this compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon each executing state until renounced by it. The duties and obligations hereunder of a renouncing state shall continue as to furloughees residing therein at the time of withdrawal until retaken or finally discharged by the sending state. Renunciation of this compact shall be by the same authority which executed it, by sending a six-month notice in writing of its intention to withdraw from the compact to the other states party hereto.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

